Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 33

Tennessee Economic Impact Disclosure Law of 1979

4-33-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Economic Impact Disclosure Law of 1979.”

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-3301.

4-33-102. Purpose — Legislative intent.

It is the purpose and intent of the general assembly by this enactment to require state agencies to state the direct and indirect costs of government programs to consumers and the relationship between the costs of a program and the benefits to be received from the program.

The general assembly intends this chapter to supplement existing laws and regulations.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect existing statutory obligations of a state agency.

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-3302.

4-33-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means every department or organization described in chapter 3 of this title; and

“Agency action” includes any action by an agency or subdivision thereof that may have substantial economic impact upon any person. Substantial economic impact may occur through a related series of agency decisions that individually may not have substantial economic impact, but that cumulatively have substantial economic impact.

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-3303.

4-33-104. Economic impact statements.

Upon written request by the commissioner or head of any agency, or by any member of the general assembly, each agency shall within a reasonable time justify a proposed action by preparing an economic impact statement using professionally accepted methodology, with quantification of data to the extent practicable, giving effect to both short-term and long-term consequences; provided, that this section shall not apply to any action of the department of transportation in which federal-aid matching funds are used.

The economic impact statement shall include the following information:

A description of the action proposed, the purpose of the action, the legal authority for the action and the plan for implementing the action;

A determination that the action is the least-cost method for achieving the stated purpose;

A comparison of the cost-benefit relation of the action to nonaction;

A determination that the action represents the most efficient allocation of public and private resources;

A determination of the effect of the action on competition;

A determination of the effect of the action on the cost of living in the geographical area in which the action would occur;

A determination of the effect of the action on employment in the geographical area in which the action would occur;

The source of revenue to be used for the action; and

A conclusion as to the economic impact upon all persons substantially affected by the action, including an analysis containing a description as to which persons will bear the costs of the action and which persons will benefit directly and indirectly from the action.

If, during the course of an agency action, information required by the economic impact statement materially changes, the agency shall amend the statement with the correct information.

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-3304; Acts 1980, ch. 664, § 1.

4-33-105. [Reserved.]

The following agency actions are exempt from this chapter:

The collection and payment of social security funds, retirement funds or employee benefit funds;

Participation in any federal program, if under federal law the participation would be prevented by compliance with this chapter;

All emergency rules, or emergency purchases, if the governor agrees that an emergency exists and that a timely economic impact statement could not be prepared, but within a reasonable period of time after the action, an appropriate economic impact statement shall be prepared;

All legislative actions;

All purchases by any state agency that have a fair market value or monetary value that is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

Ministerial action by an agency that complies with applicable statutes and rules; provided, however, this exemption does not include an agency action where the contracting of services is considered or used instead of state employees;

Action by a state agency that is required by law to be maintained as confidential;

The preparation and sale of all bonds that are processed by the state funding board;

Expenditures of money from trust funds that previously have been designed by the general assembly for a specific purpose;

The prosecution of civil, criminal or administrative actions before any court or before an administrative hearing officer; and

Actions involving persons in the custody of the state voluntarily or under court order.

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-3306; Acts 1994, ch. 777, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-33-107. Copies of economic impact statements.

In addition to any copies that may be provided to other individuals or entities, each agency that prepares an economic impact statement pursuant to this chapter shall provide a copy of such impact statement to the senate and house of representatives government operations committees.

Acts 1979, ch. 215, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-3307.

4-33-106. Exempt agency actions.